Massachusetts, session 194th, S895.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 6D of the General Laws, as most recently amended by 
2 chapter 342 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of 
3 “Alternative payment methodologies or methods” the following 2 definitions:- 
4  “Biosimilar”, a drug that is produced or distributed under a biologics license application 
5 approved under 42 U.S.C. 262(k)(3). 
6  “Brand name drug”, a drug that is: (i) produced or distributed pursuant to an original new 
7 drug application approved under 21 U.S.C. 355(c) except for: (a) any drug approved through an 
8 application submitted under section 505(b)(2) of the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act that 
9 is pharmaceutically equivalent, as that term is defined by the United States Food and Drug 

2 of 16 10 Administration, to a drug approved under 21 U.S.C. 355(c); (b) an abbreviated new drug 
11 application that was approved by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services 
12 under section 505(c) of the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. 355(c), before the 
13 date of the enactment of the federal Drug Price Competition and Patent Term Restoration Act of 
14 1984, Public Law 98-417, 98 Stat. 1585; or (c) an authorized generic drug as defined by 42 
15 C.F.R. 447.502; (ii) produced or distributed pursuant to a biologics license application approved 
16 under 42 U.S.C. 262(a)(2)(C); or (iii) identified by the carrier as a brand name drug based on 
17 available data resources such as Medi-Span. 
18  SECTION 2. Said section 1 of chapter 6D is hereby amended by inserting after the 
19 definition of “Physician” the following definition:- 
20  “Pipeline drug”, a prescription drug product containing a new molecular entity for which 
21 the sponsor has submitted a new drug application or biologics license application and received an 
22 action date from the United States Food and Drug Administration. 
23  SECTION 2. Said chapter 6D is hereby amended by inserting after section 15 the 
24 following section:- 
25  Section 15A. (a) A pharmaceutical manufacturing company shall provide early notice to 
26 the commission in a manner described in this section for a: (i) pipeline drug; (ii) generic drug; or 
27 (iii) biosimilar drug. The commission shall provide nonconfidential information received under 
28 this section to the office of Medicaid, the division of insurance and the group insurance 
29 commission. 
30  Early notice under this subsection shall be submitted to the commission in writing not 
31 later than 30 days after receipt of the United States Food and Drug Administration approval date. 

3 of 16 32  For each pipeline drug, early notice shall include a brief description of the: (i) primary 
33 disease, health condition or therapeutic area being studied and the indication; (ii) route of 
34 administration being studied; (iii) clinical trial comparators; and (iv) estimated date of market 
35 entry. To the extent possible, information shall be collected using data fields consistent with 
36 those used by the federal National Institutes of Health for clinical trials.  
37  For each pipeline drug, early notice shall include whether the drug has been designated 
38 by the United States Food and Drug Administration: (i) as an orphan drug; (ii) for fast track; (iii) 
39 as a breakthrough therapy; (iv) for accelerated approval; or (v) for priority review for a new 
40 molecular entity; provided, however, that notwithstanding clause (v), submissions for drugs in 
41 development that are designated as new molecular entities by the United States Food and Drug 
42 Administration shall be provided as soon as practical upon receipt of the relevant designations. 
43 For each generic drug, early notice shall include a copy of the drug label approved by the United 
44 States Food and Drug Administration. 
45  (b) A pharmaceutical manufacturing company shall provide early notice to the 
46 commission if it plans to increase the wholesale acquisition cost of a: (i) brand-name drug by 
47 more than 15 per cent per wholesale acquisition cost unit during any 12-month period; or (ii) 
48 generic drug or biosimilar drug with a significant price increase as determined by the 
49 commission during any 12-month period. The commission shall provide non-confidential 
50 information received under this section to the office of Medicaid, the division of insurance and 
51 the group insurance commission. 
52  Early notice under this subsection shall be submitted to the commission in writing not 
53 less than 60 days before the planned effective date of the increase. 

4 of 16 54  A pharmaceutical manufacturing company required to notify the commission of a price 
55 increase under this subsection shall, not less than 30 days before the planned effective date of the 
56 increase, report to the commission any information regarding the price increase that is relevant to 
57 the commission including, but not limited to: (i) drug identification information; (ii) drug sales 
58 volume information; (iii) wholesale price and related information for the drug; (iv) net price and 
59 related information for the drug; (v) drug acquisition information, if applicable; (vi) revenue 
60 from the sale of the drug; and (vii) manufacturer costs. 
61  (c) The commission shall conduct an annual study of pharmaceutical manufacturing 
62 companies subject to the requirements in subsections (a) and (b). The commission may contract 
63 with a third-party entity to implement this section. 
64  (d) If a pharmaceutical manufacturing company fails to timely comply with the 
65 requirements under subsection (a) or subsection (b), or otherwise knowingly obstructs the 
66 commission’s ability to receive early notice under this section, including, but not limited to, 
67 providing incomplete, false or misleading information, the commission shall impose appropriate 
68 sanctions against the manufacturer, including reasonable monetary penalties not to exceed 
69 $1,000,000, in each instance. The commission shall seek to promote compliance with this section 
70 and shall only impose a civil penalty on the manufacturer as a last resort. Amounts collected 
71 under this section shall be deposited into the Prescription Drug Cost Assistance Trust Fund 
72 established in section 2EEEEEE of chapter 29. 
73  SECTION 3. Said chapter 6D is hereby further amended by adding the following 2 
74 sections:- 

5 of 16 75  Section 24. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following 
76 meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise: 
77  “Eligible drug”, (i) a brand name drug or biologic, not including a biosimilar, that has a 
78 launch wholesale acquisition cost of $50,000 or more for a 1-year supply or full course of 
79 treatment; (ii) a biosimilar drug that has a launch wholesale acquisition cost that is not at least 15 
80 per cent lower than the referenced brand biologic at the time the biosimilar is launched; (iii) a 
81 public health essential drug, as defined in subsection (f) of section 13 of chapter 17, with a 
82 significant price increase over a defined period of time as determined by the commission by 
83 regulation or with a wholesale acquisition cost of $25,000 or more for a 1-year supply or full 
84 course of treatment; (iv) all drugs, continuous glucose monitoring system components, all 
85 components of the continuous glucose monitoring system of which the component is a part and, 
86 when applicable, delivery devices selected pursuant to section 17T of chapter 32A, section 10R 
87 of chapter 118E, section 47UU of chapter 175, section 8VV of chapter 176A, section 4VV of 
88 chapter 176B and section 4NN of chapter 176G; or (v) other prescription drug products that may 
89 have a direct and significant impact and create affordability challenges for the state’s health care 
90 system and patients, as determined by the commission; provided, however, that the commission 
91 shall promulgate regulations to establish the type of prescription drug products classified under 
92 clause (v) prior to classification of any such prescription drug product under said clause (v).  
93  “Public health essential drug”, shall have the same meaning as defined in subsection (f) 
94 of section 13 of chapter 17.  

6 of 16 95  (b) The commission shall review the impact of eligible drug costs on patient access; 
96 provided, however, that the commission may prioritize the review of eligible drugs based on 
97 potential impact to consumers. 
98  In conducting a review of eligible drugs, the commission may request information 
99 relating to the pricing of an eligible drug from the pharmaceutical manufacturing company of 
100 said eligible drug. Upon receiving a request for information from the commission, a 
101 pharmaceutical manufacturing company shall disclose to the commission, within a reasonable 
102 time period, as determined by the commission, applicable information relating to the 
103 manufacturer’s pricing of an eligible drug.  
104  The disclosed information shall be on a standard reporting form developed by the 
105 commission and shall include, but not be limited to: 
106  (i) a schedule of the drug’s wholesale acquisition cost increases over the previous 5 
107 calendar years; 
108  (ii) the total amount of federal and state tax credits, incentives, grants and other subsidies 
109 provided to the pharmaceutical manufacturing company over the previous 10 calendar years that 
110 have been used to assist in the research and development of eligible drugs; 
111  (iii) the pharmaceutical manufacturing company’s aggregate, company-level research and 
112 development and other relevant capital expenditures, including facility construction, for the most 
113 recent year for which final audited data are available; 

7 of 16 114  (iv) a narrative description, absent proprietary information and written in plain language, 
115 of factors that contributed to reported changes in wholesale acquisition cost during the previous 5 
116 calendar years; and 
117  (v) any other information that the pharmaceutical manufacturing company wishes to 
118 provide to the commission or that the commission requests. 
119  (c) Based on the records provided under subsection (b) and available information from 
120 the center for health information and analysis or an outside third party, the commission shall 
121 identify a proposed value for the eligible drug. The commission may request additional relevant 
122 information that it deems necessary from the pharmaceutical manufacturing company and from 
123 other entities, including, but not limited to, payers and pharmacy benefit managers. 
124  Any information, analyses or reports regarding an eligible drug review shall be provided 
125 to the pharmaceutical manufacturing company. The commission shall consider any clarifications 
126 or data provided by the pharmaceutical manufacturing company with respect to the eligible drug. 
127 The commission shall not base its determination on the proposed value of the eligible drug solely 
128 on the analysis or research of an outside third party and shall not employ a measure or metric that 
129 assigns a reduced value to the life extension provided by a treatment based on a pre-existing 
130 disability or chronic health condition of the individuals whom the treatment would benefit. If the 
131 commission relies upon a third party to provide cost-effectiveness analysis or research related to 
132 the proposed value of the eligible drug, such analysis or research shall also include, but not be 
133 limited to: (i) a description of the methodologies and models used in its analysis; (ii) any 
134 assumptions and potential limitations of research findings in the context of the results; and (iii) 
135 outcomes for affected subpopulations that utilize the drug, including, but not limited to, potential 

8 of 16 136 impacts on individuals of marginalized racial or ethnic groups and on individuals with specific 
137 disabilities or health conditions who regularly utilize the eligible drug. 
138  (d) If, after review of an eligible drug and after receiving information from the 
139 pharmaceutical manufacturing company under subsection (b) or subsection (e), the commission 
140 determines that the pharmaceutical manufacturing company’s pricing of the eligible drug does 
141 not substantially exceed the proposed value of the drug, the commission shall notify the 
142 pharmaceutical manufacturing company, in writing, of its determination and shall evaluate other 
143 ways to mitigate the eligible drug’s cost in order to improve patient access to the eligible drug. 
144 The commission may engage with the pharmaceutical manufacturing company and other 
145 relevant stakeholders, including, but not limited to, patients, patient advocacy organizations, 
146 consumer advocacy organizations, providers, provider organizations and payers, to explore 
147 options for mitigating the cost of the eligible drug. Upon the conclusion of a stakeholder 
148 engagement process under this subsection, the commission shall issue recommendations on ways 
149 to reduce the cost of the eligible drug for the purpose of improving patient access to the eligible 
150 drug. Recommendations may include but shall not be limited to: (i) an alternative payment plan 
151 or methodology; (ii) a bulk purchasing program; (iii) co-payment, deductible, co-insurance or 
152 other cost-sharing restrictions; and (iv) a reinsurance program to subsidize the cost of the eligible 
153 drug. The recommendations shall be publicly posted on the commission’s website and provided 
154 to the clerks of the house of representatives and senate, the joint committee on health care 
155 financing and the house and senate committees on ways and means; provided, however, that the 
156 report shall be published on the website of the commission. 
157  (e) If, after review of an eligible drug, the commission determines that the pharmaceutical 
158 manufacturing company’s pricing of the eligible drug substantially exceeds the proposed value 

9 of 16 159 of the drug, the commission shall request that the pharmaceutical manufacturing company 
160 provide further information related to the pricing of the eligible drug and the pharmaceutical 
161 manufacturing company’s reasons for the pricing not later than 30 days after receiving the 
162 request. 
163  (f) Not later than 60 days after receiving information from the pharmaceutical 
164 manufacturing company under subsection (b) or subsection (e), the commission shall 
165 confidentially issue a determination on whether the pharmaceutical manufacturing company’s 
166 pricing of an eligible drug substantially exceeds the commission’s proposed value of the drug. If 
167 the commission determines that the pharmaceutical manufacturing company’s pricing of an 
168 eligible drug substantially exceeds the proposed value of the drug, the commission shall 
169 confidentially notify the manufacturer, in writing, of its determination and may require the 
170 manufacturer to enter into an access and affordability improvement plan under section 25. 
171  (g) Records disclosed by a pharmaceutical manufacturing company under this section 
172 shall: (i) be accompanied by an attestation that all information provided is true and correct; (ii) 
173 not be public records under clause Twenty-sixth of section 7 of chapter 4 or under chapter 66; 
174 and (iii) remain confidential; provided, however, that the commission may produce reports 
175 summarizing any findings; provided further, that any such report shall not be in a form that 
176 identifies specific prices charged for or rebate amounts associated with drugs by a manufacturer 
177 or in a manner that is likely to compromise the financial, competitive or proprietary nature of the 
178 information. 
179  Any request for further information made by the commission under subsection (e) or any 
180 determination issued or written notification made by the commission under subsection (f) shall 

10 of 16 181 not be public records under said clause Twenty-sixth of said section 7 of said chapter 4 or under 
182 said chapter 66. 
183  (h) The commission’s proposed value of an eligible drug and the commission’s 
184 underlying analysis of the eligible drug is not intended to be used to determine whether any 
185 individual patient meets prior authorization or utilization management criteria for the eligible 
186 drug. The proposed value and underlying analysis shall not be the sole factor in determining 
187 whether a drug is included in a formulary or whether the drug is subject to step therapy. 
188  (i) If the pharmaceutical manufacturing company fails to timely comply with the 
189 commission’s request for records under subsection (b) or subsection (e), or otherwise knowingly 
190 obstructs the commission’s ability to issue its determination under subsection (f), including, but 
191 not limited to, by providing incomplete, false or misleading information, the commission shall 
192 impose appropriate sanctions against the pharmaceutical manufacturing company, including 
193 reasonable monetary penalties not to exceed $1,000,000, in each instance. The commission shall 
194 seek to promote compliance with this section and shall only impose a civil penalty on the 
195 manufacturer as a last resort. Penalties collected under this subsection shall be deposited into the 
196 Prescription Drug Cost Assistance Trust Fund established in section 2EEEEEE of chapter 29. 
197  (j) The commission shall adopt any written policies, procedures or regulations that the 
198 commission determines are necessary to effectuate the purpose of this section. 
199  Section 25. (a) The commission shall establish procedures to assist manufacturers in 
200 filing and implementing an access and affordability improvement plan. 
201  Upon providing written notice provided under subsection (f) of section 24, the 
202 commission may require that a pharmaceutical manufacturing company whose pricing of an 

11 of 16 203 eligible drug substantially exceeds the commission’s proposed value of the drug file an access 
204 and affordability improvement plan with the commission. Not later than 45 days after receipt of a 
205 notice under said subsection (f) of said section 24, a pharmaceutical manufacturing company 
206 shall: (i) file an access and affordability improvement plan; or (ii) provide written notice 
207 declining participation in the access and affordability improvement plan.  
208  (b) An access and affordability improvement plan shall: (i) be generated by the 
209 pharmaceutical manufacturing company; (ii) identify the reasons for the pharmaceutical 
210 manufacturing company’s drug price; and (iii) include, but not be limited to, specific strategies, 
211 adjustments and action steps the pharmaceutical manufacturing company proposes to implement 
212 to address the cost of the eligible drug in order to improve the accessibility and affordability of 
213 the eligible drug for patients and the state’s health system. The proposed access and affordability 
214 improvement plan shall include specific identifiable and measurable expected outcomes and a 
215 timetable for implementation. The timetable for an access and affordability improvement plan 
216 shall not exceed 18 months. 
217  (c) The commission shall approve any access and affordability improvement plan that it 
218 determines: (i) is reasonably likely to address the cost of an eligible drug in order to substantially 
219 improve the accessibility and affordability of the eligible drug for patients and the state’s health 
220 system; and (ii) has a reasonable expectation for successful implementation. 
221  (d) If the commission determines that the proposed access and affordability improvement 
222 plan is unacceptable or incomplete, the commission may provide consultation on the criteria that 
223 have not been met and may allow an additional time period of not more than 30 calendar days for 
224 resubmission; provided, however, that all aspects of the access plan shall be proposed by the 

12 of 16 225 pharmaceutical manufacturing company and the commission shall not require specific elements 
226 for approval. 
227  (e) Upon approval of the proposed access and affordability improvement plan, the 
228 commission shall notify the pharmaceutical manufacturing company to begin immediate 
229 implementation of the access and affordability improvement plan. Public notice shall be 
230 provided by the commission on its website, identifying that the pharmaceutical manufacturing 
231 company is implementing an access and affordability improvement plan; provided, however, that 
232 upon the successful completion of the access and affordability improvement plan, the identity of 
233 the pharmaceutical manufacturing company shall be removed from the commission's website. 
234 All pharmaceutical manufacturing companies implementing an approved access improvement 
235 plan shall be subject to additional reporting requirements and compliance monitoring as 
236 determined by the commission. The commission shall provide assistance to the pharmaceutical 
237 manufacturing company in the successful implementation of the access and affordability 
238 improvement plan. 
239  (f) All pharmaceutical manufacturing companies shall work in good faith to implement 
240 the access and affordability improvement plan. At any point during the implementation of the 
241 access and affordability improvement plan, the pharmaceutical manufacturing company may file 
242 amendments to the access improvement plan, subject to approval of the commission. 
243  (g) At the conclusion of the timetable established in the access and affordability 
244 improvement plan, the pharmaceutical manufacturing company shall report to the commission 
245 regarding the outcome of the access and affordability improvement plan. If the commission 
246 determines that the access and affordability improvement plan was unsuccessful, the commission 

13 of 16 247 shall: (i) extend the implementation timetable of the existing access and affordability 
248 improvement plan; (ii) approve amendments to the access and affordability improvement plan as 
249 proposed by the pharmaceutical manufacturing company; (iii) require the pharmaceutical 
250 manufacturing company to submit a new access and affordability improvement plan; or (iv) 
251 waive or delay the requirement to file any additional access and affordability improvement plans. 
252  (h) The commission shall submit a recommendation for proposed legislation to the joint 
253 committee on health care financing if the commission determines that further legislative 
254 authority is needed to assist pharmaceutical manufacturing company with the implementation of 
255 access and affordability improvement plans or to otherwise ensure compliance with this section. 
256  (i) An access and affordability improvement plan under this section shall remain 
257 confidential in accordance with section 2A. 
258  (j) The commission shall assess a civil penalty to a pharmaceutical manufacturing 
259 company of not more than $1,000,000, in each instance, if the commission determines that the 
260 pharmaceutical manufacturing company: (i) declined or willfully neglected to file an access and 
261 affordability improvement plan with the commission under subsection (a); (ii) failed to file an 
262 acceptable access and affordability improvement plan in good faith with the commission; (iii) 
263 failed to implement the access and affordability improvement plan in good faith; or (iv) 
264 knowingly failed to provide information required by this section to the commission or knowingly 
265 falsified the information. The commission shall seek to promote compliance with this section and 
266 shall only impose a civil penalty as a last resort. Penalties collected under this subsection shall be 
267 deposited into the Prescription Drug Cost Assistance Trust Fund established in section 2EEEEEE 
268 of chapter 29. 

14 of 16 269  (k) If a pharmaceutical manufacturing company declines to enter into an access and 
270 affordability improvement plan under this section, the commission may publicly post the 
271 proposed value of the eligible drug, hold a public hearing on the proposed value of the eligible 
272 drug and solicit public comment. The pharmaceutical manufacturing company shall appear and 
273 testify at the public hearing held on the eligible drug’s proposed value. Upon the conclusion of a 
274 public hearing under this subsection, the commission shall issue recommendations on ways to 
275 reduce the cost of an eligible drug for the purpose of improving patient access to the eligible 
276 drug. The recommendations shall be publicly posted on the commission’s website and provided 
277 to the clerks of the house of representatives and senate, the joint committee on health care 
278 financing and the house and senate committees on ways and means. 
279  If a pharmaceutical manufacturing company is deemed to not be acting in good faith to 
280 develop an acceptable or complete access and affordability improvement plan, the commission 
281 may publicly post the proposed value of the eligible drug, hold a public hearing on the proposed 
282 value of the eligible drug and solicit public comment. The pharmaceutical manufacturing 
283 company shall appear and testify at any hearing held on the eligible drug’s proposed value. Upon 
284 the conclusion of a public hearing under this subsection, the commission shall issue 
285 recommendations on ways to reduce the cost of an eligible drug for the purpose of improving 
286 patient access to the eligible drug. The recommendations shall be publicly posted on the 
287 commission’s website and provided to the clerks of the house of representatives and senate, the 
288 joint committee on health care financing and the house and senate committees on ways and 
289 means. 
290  Before making a determination that the pharmaceutical manufacturing company is not 
291 acting in good faith, the commission shall send a written notice to the pharmaceutical 

15 of 16 292 manufacturing company that the commission shall deem the pharmaceutical manufacturing 
293 company to not be acting in good faith if the pharmaceutical manufacturing company does not 
294 submit an acceptable access and affordability improvement plan within 30 days of receipt of 
295 notice; provided, however, that the commission shall not send a notice under this paragraph 
296 within 120 calendar days from the date that the commission notified the pharmaceutical 
297 manufacturing company of its requirement to enter into the access and affordability improvement 
298 plan. 
299  (l) The commission shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement this section. 
300  SECTION 4. Section 13 of chapter 17 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding 
301 the following subsection:- 
302  (f) As used in this subsection, the following words shall have the following meanings 
303 unless the context clearly requires otherwise: 
304  “Public health essential drug”, a prescription drug, biologic or biosimilar approved by the 
305 United States Food and Drug Administration that: (i) appears on the Model List of Essential 
306 Medicines most recently adopted by the World Health Organization; or (ii) is deemed an 
307 essential medicine by the commission due to its efficacy in treating a life-threatening health 
308 condition or a chronic health condition that substantially impairs an individual’s ability to engage 
309 in activities of daily living or because limited access to a certain population would pose a public 
310 health challenge. 
311  The commission shall identify and publish a list of public health essential drugs. The list 
312 shall be updated not less than annually and be made publicly available on the department’s 
313 website; provided, however, that the commission may provide an interim listing of a public 

16 of 16 314 health essential drug prior to an annual update. The commission shall notify and forward a copy 
315 of the list to the health policy commission established under chapter 6D.